District of Columbia statutes.
42-2012

Merger no bar to reconstitution.

The merger provided for in the preceding section shall in no way bar the subsequent constitution of the property into another horizontal property regime whenever so desired and upon observance of the provisions of this subchapter.

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 454, Pub. L. 88-218, § 12
1981 Ed., § 45-1712.
1973 Ed., § 5-912.
Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.